Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 923.
Quasi-judicial process.

In order to protect the rights of interested persons and the public, the process described in this section shall be used whenever so provided by other provisions of this title. As used in this section, “interested person” means a person who has a legal interest of record in the property that would be affected by the proposed action.

Notice. The selectboard shall give written notice by certified mail or by one of the methods allowed by Rule 4 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure for service of original process to any interested person describing the proposed activity affecting the property. The notice shall include a date and time when the selectboard shall inspect the premises. The notice shall precede the inspection by 30 days or more except in the case of an emergency.

Inspection of premises. The selectboard shall view the area and receive any testimony pertinent to the problem, including suggested awards for damages, if any.

Necessity. The selectboard shall decide on the necessity for the activity or work proposed and establish any conditions for accomplishing it. This includes the award of damages, if applicable. The selectboard shall announce the decision and the reason for it within 10 days of the inspection unless the selectboard formally delays the proceeding in order to receive more testimony.

Notifying parties. The selectboard shall notify the interested persons and other interested parties of its decision. It shall file a copy of its decision with the town clerk within 10 days of its announcement.

Appeal. If an interested person is dissatisfied with the award for damages, he or she may appeal using any of the procedures listed in chapter 5 of this title. Notice or petition for appeal shall not delay the proposed work or activity.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 924.
Change of grade.

The elevation of a highway shall not be changed by cutting down or raising the roadbed in front of a dwelling house or any other building adjacent to the highway more than three feet without following the procedure under section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 925.
Laying fences down.

When the selectboard determines that a highway is liable to be obstructed by snowdrifts, and the fences adjoining the highway can be conveniently laid down, it may cause any portion to be laid down during the winter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 926.
Damages; appeal.

The selectboard shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title in giving notice, inspecting property, determining need, awarding damages, and satisfying appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 927.
Snow fence.

When the selectboard determines that a highway is liable to be obstructed by snowdrifts that may be prevented by erecting a snow fence on land adjoining the highway, and on notice to and hearing of the owner or occupant of the land, it may cause a fence to be built and maintained.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 928.
Damages; appeal.

The selectboard shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title in giving notice, inspecting property, determining need, awarding damages, and satisfying appeals.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.